Utah statutes.
17-36-25.   Budget appropriation increase.
The budget appropriation of any budgetary fund other than the general fund may
be increased at any regular meeting of the governing body, provided that
notice that such action will be considered is published:
(1) (a)  at least five days before the meeting in at least one issue of a
newspaper of general circulation in the county, if there is one; or
(b)  if there is no newspaper as described in Subsection (1)(a), by posting it
in three conspicuous places within the county five days before the meeting;
and
(2)  in accordance with Section 45-1-101 for five days before the meeting.
